pl: Materiał słupa/słupka: Aluminium; Włókno szklane; Żelazo; Tworzywo sztuczne; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Drewno; Inne
fr: Matériau du poteau: Aluminum; Fibre de verre; Fer; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Bois; Autre
vi: Vật liệu cọc: Nhôm; Sợi thủy tinh; Sắt; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Gỗ; Khác
nl: Materiaal paal: Aluminium; Glasvezel; IJzer; Plastic; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Hout; Andere
sk-SK: Materiál tyče/stĺpika: Hliník; Sklolaminát; Železo; Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Drevo; Iné
hr-HR: Materijal štapa/stalka: Aluminij; Stakloplastika; Željezo; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเสา: อะลูมิเนียม; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; เหล็ก; พลาสติก; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Stovo / koto medžiaga: Aliuminis; Stiklo pluoštas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Plastikas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Mediena; Kita
hu: Rúd/nyél anyaga: Alumínium; Üveggyapot; Vas; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Fa; Egyéb
bg-BG: Материал за стълб/кол: Алуминий; Fiberglass; Желязо; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Дърво; Други
el: Υλικό ράβδου/στύλου: Αλουμίνιο; Υαλοβάμβακας; Σίδερο; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Ξύλο; Άλλο
cs: Materiál tyče/sloupku: Hliník; Skelná vata; Železo; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Dřevo; Jiné
de: Pfahl-/Pfostenmaterial: Aluminium; Fiberglas; Eisen; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Stahl; Holz; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Material do poste: Alumínio; Fibra de vidro; Ferro; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Outro
ro-RO: Material stâlp/par: Aluminiu; Fibră de sticlă; Fier; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Lemn; Altele
sv: Stolpe/påle - material: Aluminium; Glasfiber; Järn; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Trä; Övrigt
es: Material del poste: Aluminio; Fibra de vidrio; Hierro; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Madera; Otros
zh-CN: 杆子/柱子材质: 铝; 玻璃纤维; 铁; 塑料; 不锈钢; 钢; 木头; 其他
nb: Stang-/stolpemateriale: Aluminium; Glassfiber; Jern; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Trevirke; Annet
pt-PT: Material do poste: Alumínio; Fibra de vidro; Ferro; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Outro
it: Materiale palo/palo: Alluminio; Vetroresina; Ferro; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Legno; Altro
da: Stang-/stolpemateriale: Aluminum; Glasfiber; Jern; Plast; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Træ; Andet
tr: Direk malzemesi: Alüminyum; Fiberglas; Demir; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Ahşap; Diğer
ko: 기둥/포스트 재료: 알루미늄; 유리 섬유; 철; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 목재; 기타
en: Pole/Post material: Aluminum; Fiberglass; Iron; Plastic; Stainless steel; Steel; Wood; Other
ru: Материал стержня: Алюминий; Стекловолокно; Железо; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Дерево; Другое
ja: ポール/ポスト材料: アルミニウム; ガラス繊維; 鉄; プラスチック; ステンレススチール; スチール; 木材; その他
sl-SI: Material za palice/stebre: Aluminij; Steklena vlakna; Železo; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Les; Drugo
zh-TW: 桿/柱材質: 鋁; 玻璃纖維; 鐵; 塑膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 木材; 其他
fi: Pylväs-/tolppamateriaali: Alumiini; Lasikuitu; Rauta; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Puu; Muu